Maine, session 132, LD1185.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 19-A MRSA §652, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2023, c. 116, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 19-A MRSA §652, sub-§8, as amended by PL 2023, c. 116, §2, is further
amended to read:
8. Parties under 17 18 years of age. The clerk or State Registrar of Vital Statistics
may not issue a marriage license to a person under 17 18 years of age.
Page 1 - 132LR1132(02)